Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.290

Appeal process.

Final determinations by the committee may be appealed to the board within seven days by the public body or by an interested party. A written notice of an appeal must be provided to the committee and, as applicable, to the public body. The board shall resolve an appeal within forty-five days of receipt of the appeal and shall send a written determination of its decision to the party making the appeal and to the appropriate public body, as applicable. The public body shall comply with the determination of the board.

[ 2007 c 494 s 109.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.